Maine, session 132, LD1124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§7, ¶N is enacted to read:
N. For a judicial employee who retires after January 1, 2026 under the provisions of
section 17851, subsection 18, the State shall contribute 100% of the individual
premium until the retiree reaches 65 years of age or otherwise qualifies for Medicare,
whichever is earlier.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17851, sub-§18 is enacted to read:
18. Judicial employees; 35 years of creditable service. An employee of the judicial
branch qualifies for a service retirement benefit before the employee reaches the
employee's normal retirement age if the employee:
A. Retires before reaching 65 years of age; and
B. Retires upon completion of 35 years of continuous creditable service in that
capacity.
Sec. 3. Calculation of salary savings; adjustment of salary schedules for
judicial employees. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services shall calculate any savings in salary
and other associated costs due to the retirement of judicial employees pursuant to the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 17851, subsection 18. Effective for fiscal year 2026-27,
the savings calculated pursuant to this section must be used to increase salaries of
employees of the judicial branch. Salary increases pursuant to this section must prioritize
salary increases for those judicial positions identified by the Department of Administrative
and Financial Services as underpaid based on a comparison of regional and national salaries
for those positions.